Alabama, session 2026rs, HB105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
61 Section 1. Sections 13A-6-69, 13A-6-122, and 13A-6-126,
62 Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
63 "§13A-6-69
64 (a) It shall be unlawful for any A person commits the
65 crime of enticing a child for immoral purposes if, with
66 lascivious intent, to entice, allure, persuade, or invite, he
67 or she entices, allures, persuades, grooms, or invites; or
68 attempt attempts to entice, allure, persuade, groom, or
69 invite, any child under 16 years of age to enter any vehicle,
70 room, house, office, or other place for any of the following
71 reasons:
72 (1) For the purpose of proposing to such the child the
73 performance of an act of sexual intercourse or an act which
74 constitutes the offense of sodomy or for the purpose of
75 proposing the fondling or feeling of the sexual or genital
76 parts of such child or the breast of such child,any of the
77 following:
78 a. A sex offense pursuant to Section 15-20A-5.
79 b. Sexual conduct pursuant to Section 13A-12-200.1.
80 c. A sexual performance.
81 d. Genital mutilation.
82 (2) To commit any of the following:
83 a. A sex offense pursuant to Section 15-20A-5 against
84 the child.
Page 3

the child.
HB105 INTRODUCED
85 b. Sexual conduct pursuant to Section 13A-12-200.1.
86 c. A sexual performance.
87 d. Genital mutilation.
88 (3) or for For the purpose of committing an aggravated
89 assault on such child, or for the purpose of proposing that
90 such child fondle or feel the sexual or genital parts of such
91 persona violation of Section 26-15-3 against the child.
92 (b) A violation of this section is a Class C felony.
93 (c) For the purposes of this section, the term "groom"
94 means to engage in a pattern of behavior that seeks to
95 prepare, induce, or persuade a child. The behavior may
96 include, but is not limited to, deliberate acts of
97 establishing an emotional connection with a child through
98 manipulation, trust-building, influence, gift-giving, or
99 physical touching, and may be facilitated by any of the
100 following:
101 (1) Electronic communication.
102 (2) Online activities.
103 (3) In-person activities.
104 (4) Use of third parties.
105 (5) Indirect methods."
106 "§13A-6-122
107 (a) A person commits the crime of electronic
108 solicitation of a child if who he or she knowingly entices,
109 induces, persuades, seduces, prevails, advises, coerces,
110 lures, directs, grooms, or orders,; or attempts to entice,
111 induce, persuade, seduce, prevail, advise, coerce, lure,
112 direct, groom, or order,; by electronic or digital means of a
Page 4

direct, groom, or order,; by electronic or digital means of a
HB105 INTRODUCED
113 computer, on-line service, Internet service, Internet bulletin
114 board service, weblog, cellular phone, video game system,
115 personal data assistant, telephone, facsimile machine, camera,
116 universal serial bus drive, writable compact disc, magnetic
117 storage device, floppy disk, or any other electronic
118 communication or storage device, a child who is at least three
119 years younger than the defendant, or another person believed
120 by individual the defendant believes to be a child at least
121 three years younger than the defendant, to meet with the
122 defendant or any other person for the purpose of engaging
123 engage in sexual intercourse, sodomy, sexual contact, sexual
124 performance, obscene sexual performance, sexual conduct, any
125 of the following:
126 (1) A sex offense pursuant to Section 15-20A-5.
127 (2) Sexual conduct pursuant to Section 13A-12-200.1.
128 (3) A sexual performance.
129 (4)or genital Genital mutilation, or directs a child
130 to engage in sexual intercourse, sodomy, sexual contact,
131 sexual performance, obscene sexual performance, sexual
132 conduct, or genital mutilation is guilty of electronic
133 solicitation of a child.
134 (b) Any person who violates this section commits
135 Electronic solicitation of a child is a Class B felony.
136 (c) For the purposes of this section, the term "groom"
137 means to engage in a pattern of behavior that seeks to
138 prepare, induce, or persuade a child. The behavior may
139 include, but is not limited to, deliberate acts of
140 establishing an emotional connection with a child through
Page 5

establishing an emotional connection with a child through
HB105 INTRODUCED
141 manipulation, trust-building, influence, gift-giving, or
142 physical touching, and may be facilitated by any of the
143 following:
144 (1) Electronic communication.
145 (2) Online activities.
146 (3) In-person activities.
147 (4) Use of third parties.
148 (5) Indirect methods."
149 "§13A-6-126
150 (a) For purposes of determining jurisdiction of this
151 article, the offense is committed in this state if any of the
152 acts committed under Sections 13A-6-121, 13A-6-122, or
153 13A-6-123 either originate in or are received in this state.
154 (b) For purposes of determining jurisdiction of this
155 article, the offense is committed in any county in which any
156 part of the crime took place, the victim or defendant resided,
157 or any images were received.
158 (c) The purpose of this section is to confer
159 jurisdiction upon the courts of this state to the maximum
160 extent allowable under the Constitution of the United States
161 of America and the Constitution of Alabama of 19012022."
162 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
163 1, 2026.
Page 6